src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verb inflection and derivation

!! The verbs' conjugation includes voice (in Finnish grammars also verbal 
!! genus),  tense/mood (tempus/modus), personal endings and negation marker
!! The verbs also have productive derivations to defective nouns as
!! infinitives, and to adjectives as participles, which are considered to be 
!! part of inflection and thus included in most versions 
!! ([VISK § 105](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisalto.php?p?105)).
!! The morphology of participles and historical 4th infinitive is further
!! detailed in section Deverbal nouns'  morphology.
!!
!! The analysis strings of verb are not as systematic as nouns,
!! as many categories collapse together in forms, e.g. the tense and mood
!! are only distinct with indicative past and non-past, otherwise mood implies
!! tense in semantic sense.



!! ## Verb stem variation
!!  Verbs have no allomorphic variation per se, except for some assimilation
!!  and variation of ð forms, but the stem variation is the same
!!  as in nouns. The examples for verb stems are given for each class:
!!  A infinitive's lative, e infinitive's inessive, indicative present 1st 
!!  singular, indicative present 3rd singular, indicative past 1st singular, 
!!  indicative past 3rd singular, conditional past 3rd singular, 
!!  imperative 2nd plural, potential 1st singular, present passive, 
!!  past passive, nut participle passive

!! ### Verb stems without stem variation

LEXICON VERB_KAUNISTUA
!!  The u stems have no stem variation:
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52u
!!€  kaunistua: kaunistua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # beautify
!!€  kaunistuessa: kaunistua+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine
!!€  kaunistun: kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€  kaunistuu: kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€  kaunistuin: kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€  kaunistui: kaunistua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!!€  kaunistuisi: kaunistua+V+Act+Cond+Sg3
!!€  kaunistukaa: kaunistua+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2
!!€  kaunistunen: kaunistua+V+Act+Pot+Sg1
!!€  kaunistutaan: kaunistua+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4
!!€  kaunistuttiin: kaunistua+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4
!!€  kaunistuttu: kaunistua+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom
!!€  kaunistuminen: kaunistua+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom
0  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_PUNOA
!!  The o stems have no stem variation:
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52o
!!€  punoa: punoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # bundle?
!!€  punoessa: punoa+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine
!!€  punon: punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€  punoo: punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€  punoin: punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€  punoi: punoa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!!€  punoisi: punoa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3
!!€  punokaa: punoa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2
!!€  punonen: punoa+V+Act+Pot+Sg1
!!€  punotaan: punoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4
!!€  punottiin: punoa+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4
!!€  punottu: punoa+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom
!!€  punominen: punoa+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom
0  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_SÄILÖÄ
!!  The ö stems have no stem variation:
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52ö
!!€  säilöä: säilöä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # store
!!€  säilöessä: säilöä+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine
!!€  säilön: säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€  säilöö: säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€  säilöin: säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€  säilöi: säilöä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!!€  säilöisi: säilöä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3
!!€  säilökää: säilöä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2
!!€  säilönen: säilöä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1
!!€  säilötään: säilöä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4
!!€  säilöttiin: säilöä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4
!!€  säilötty: säilöä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom
!!€  säilöminen: säilöä+V+Der/minen+Sg+Nom
0  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Ö  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ
!!  The y stems have no stem variation:
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52y
!!€  ällistyä: ällistyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # amaze
!!€  ällistyessä: ällistyä+V+Act+InfE+Sg+Ine
!!€  ällistyn: ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€  ällistyy: ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€  ällistyin: ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€  ällistyi: ällistyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!!€  ällistyisi: ällistyä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3
!!€  ällistykää: ällistyä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2
!!€  ällistynen: ällistyä+V+Act+Pot+Sg1
!!€  ällistytään: ällistyä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pe4
!!€  ällistyttiin: ällistyä+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pe4
!!€  ällistytty: ällistyä+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom
0  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

!! ### Verb stems with only gradation

LEXICON VERB_HAUKKOA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~0 o
!!€  haukkoa: haukkoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # gasp
0:ko  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ko  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_NUOKKUA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~0 u
!!€  nuokkua: nuokkua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # sleep
0:ku  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ku  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_KÄRKKYÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 k~0 y
!!€  kärkkyä: kärkkyä+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # steal a base
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_AINF  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:y  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt  VERB_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;
0:ky  VERB_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_HARPPOA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 p~0 o
!!€  harppoa: harppoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # walk
0:po  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:po  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON VERB_LOPPUA
!!€gt-norm:  Verbs 52 p~0 u
!!€  loppua: loppua+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat # end
0:pu  VERB_BACK_AINF  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_EINF  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_WEAK_PAST  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_STRONG_PAST  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_IMPERATIVE  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE_T  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut  VERB_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
0:pu  VERB_BACK_DERIV_PCPS  ;
