src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERB
ammattilaistua+V:ammattilaistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
aukoa+V:au  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
edustua+V:edustu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
esineistyä+V:esineisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
esiseuloa+V:esiseulo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
halkoa+V:hal  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
halveksua+V:halveksu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
haroa+V:haro  VERB_PUNOA  ;
harppoa+V:harp  VERB_HARPPOA  ;
haukkoa+V:hauk  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
helkkyä+V:helk  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
hieroa+V:hiero  VERB_PUNOA  ;
hiestyä+V:hiesty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
hihkua+V:hihku  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
hiukoa+V:hiu  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
hoippua+V:hoip  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
hukkua+V:huk  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
huojistua+V:huojistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
huokua+V:huo  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
häälyä+V:hääly  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
ilkkua+V:ilk  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
ilmestyä+V:ilmesty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
irtisanoa+V:irtisano  VERB_PUNOA  ;
jauhoa+V:jauho  VERB_PUNOA  ;
joikua+V:joi  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
julmistua+V:julmistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
järkeistyä+V:järkeisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
järkkyä+V:järk  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
kaikua+V:kai  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
kammoa+V:kammo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
kauhoa+V:kauho  VERB_PUNOA  ;
kaupunkilaistua+V:kaupunkilaistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
keikkua+V:keik  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
kiekua+V:kie  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
kielellistyä+V:kielellisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
kieppua+V:kiep  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
kiikkua+V:kiik  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
kiinniriippua+V:kiinniriip  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
kimmastua+V:kimmastu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
kirkua+V:kir  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
koloa+V:kolo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
korostua+V:korostu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
kukkua+V:kuk  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
kuohua+V:kuohu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
kysyä+V:kysy  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
kärkkyä+V:kärk  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
käynnistyä+V:käynnisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
lakastua+V:lakastu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
laukkoa+V:lauk  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
laukoa+V:lau  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
lerppua+V:lerp  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
lietsoa+V:lietso  VERB_PUNOA  ;
liikkua+V:liik  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
litistyä+V:litisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
liukastua+V:liukastu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
liukua+V:liu  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
loppua+V:lop  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
läikkyä+V:läik  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
löllyä+V:lölly  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
maidostua+V:maidostu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
meloa+V:melo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
moikua+V:moi  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
moninkertaistua+V:moninkertaistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
mätästyä+V:mätästy  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
nasaalistua+V:nasaalistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
naukua+V:nau  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
neuloa+V:neulo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
nuokkua+V:nuok  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
oikeistolaistua+V:oikeistolaistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
paiskoa+V:paisko  VERB_PUNOA  ;
paisua+V:paisu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
parkua+V:par  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
pensoa+V:penso  VERB_PUNOA  ;
pilkkoa+V:pilk  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
pilvistyä+V:pilvisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
poistua+V:poistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
punoa+V:puno  VERB_PUNOA  ;
päilyä+V:päily  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
raakkua+V:raak  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
raikua+V:rai  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
riehua+V:riehu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
riippua+V:riip  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
rikkoa+V:rik  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
rikkua+V:rik  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
roikua+V:roi  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
runnoa+V:runno  VERB_PUNOA  ;
rypistyä+V:rypisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
rääkkyä+V:rääk  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
saunoa+V:sauno  VERB_PUNOA  ;
seestyä+V:seesty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
seuloa+V:seulo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
sisäänastua+V:sisäänastu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
synkistyä+V:synkisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
säikkyä+V:säik  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
säilöä+V:säilö  VERB_SÄILÖÄ  ;
säästyä+V:säästy  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
teloa+V:telo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
tippua+V:tip  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
tiukkua+V:tiuk  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
todellistua+V:todellistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
tylsistyä+V:tylsisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
työlästyä+V:työlästy  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
uskoa+V:usko  VERB_PUNOA  ;
vaakkua+V:vaak  VERB_NUOKKUA  ;
vaappua+V:vaap  VERB_LOPPUA  ;
valaistua+V:valaistu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
varsoa+V:varso  VERB_PUNOA  ;
velkoa+V:vel  VERB_HAUKKOA  ;
velloa+V:vello  VERB_PUNOA  ;
venäläistyä+V:venäläisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
vihloa+V:vihlo  VERB_PUNOA  ;
viuhkoa+V:viuhko  VERB_PUNOA  ;
vyöryä+V:vyöry  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
väikkyä+V:väik  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
välkkyä+V:välk  VERB_KÄRKKYÄ  ;
vääristyä+V:vääristy  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
ylikorostua+V:ylikorostu  VERB_KAUNISTUA  ;
älyllistyä+V:älyllisty  VERB_ÄLLISTYÄ  ;
